North Carolina, session 2025, HB273.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Creation. – The General Assembly authorizes the Department of
Natural and Cultural Resources to create Brushy Mountains State Natural Area (BMSNA) in
Alexander County, Caldwell County, and Wilkes County and to add BMSNA to the State Parks
System, as provided in G.S. 143B-135.54(b). The State may receive donations of appropriate
land and may purchase other needed lands for BMSNA with existing funds in the NC Land and
Water Fund, the Parks and Recreation Trust Fund, the federal Land and Water Conservation
Fund, and other available sources of funding.
SECTION 2. Funding. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department of Natural and Cultural Resources the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000) in nonrecurring funds and two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in recurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated for initial land acquisition and site
development and associated operating costs at BMSNA.
SECTION 3. Effective Date. – Section 2 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
*H273-v-1*